Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.310

Notifications—Appeals.

The administrator of a charter public school governed by this chapter must comply with the notification provisions of RCW 28A.320.163 that apply to superintendents, designees of superintendents, and principals.

[ 2020 c 167 s 3.]